test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-lex_kiessad_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config: 
  hfst: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox: 
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests: 


  Verb - kiessâđ: # MLO, checked
    kiessâđ+V+Inf: kiessâđ
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: kiesâm
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: kiesah
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: kiäsá
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du1: kiesseen
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du2: kiesâvettee
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Du3: kiessâv
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: kiessâp
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: kiesâvetteđ
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: kiesih
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: kiessim
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: kiessih
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: kiesâi
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du1: kiesáim
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du2: kiesáid
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Du3: kiesáin
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: kiesâim
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: kiesâid
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: kiessii
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg1: kiesâččim
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg2: kiesâččih
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Sg3: kiesâččij
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du1: kiesâččáim
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du2: kiesâččáid
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Du3: kiesâččáin
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl1: kiesâččijm
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl2: kiesâččijd
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+Pl3: kiesâččii
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg1: kiesseem
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg2: kiesseeh
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Sg3: kiesâš
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du1: kiesâžeen
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du2: kiesâšvettee
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Du3: kiesâžává
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl1: kiesâžep
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl2: kiesâšvetteđ
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+Pl3: kiesâžeh

    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Sg2: kiesâ
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Sg3: kiäsus
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Du1: kiässoon
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Du2: kiessee
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Du3: kiässus
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Pl1: kiässup
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Pl2: kiessâđ
    kiessâđ+V+Imprt+Pl3: kiässus
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: kiesâ
    kiessâđ+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: kiessâm
    kiessâđ+V+Cond+Prs+ConNeg: kiesâččii
    kiessâđ+V+Pot+Prs+ConNeg: kiesii
    kiessâđ+V+PrsPrc: kiessee
    kiessâđ+V+PrfPrc: kiessâm
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Nom: kiessâm
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Ess: kiesâmin
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Loc: kiesâmist
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Ill: kiesâmân
    kiessâđ+V+Actio+Com: kiesâdijn
    kiessâđ+V+VAbess: kiesâhánnáá
